Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 6-103, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 200, O.S.L. 2023 (37A O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 6-103), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6-103. A. No retail spirits licensee shall:


1. Purchase or receive any alcoholic beverage other than from a


wine and spirits wholesaler, beer distributor, winery or small


brewer self-distribution licensee who elects to self-distribute;


2. Suffer or permit any retail container to be opened, or any


alcoholic beverage to be consumed on the licensed premises, except

Req. No. 622 Page 1


when serving samples as authorized by Section 2-109 of this title or


otherwise permitted by law; provided, the licensee shall not permit


any alcoholic beverage content or retail container unsealed in


connection with sampling authorized by Section 2-109 of this title


to remain on the licensed premises at the close of business on that


day, excluding spirits;


3. Sell any alcoholic beverages at any hour other than between


the hours of 8:00 a.m. and midnight Monday through Saturday, and


shall not be permitted to be open on Thanksgiving Day or Christmas


Day; provided, a county may, pursuant to the provisions of


subsections B and C of Section 3-124 of this title, elect to allow


such sales between the hours of noon and midnight on Sunday. Retail


spirits licensees shall be permitted to sell alcoholic beverages on


the day of any General, Primary, Runoff Primary or Special Election


whether on a national, state, county or city election, provided that


the election day does not occur on any day on which such sales are


otherwise prohibited by law;


4. Sell spirits in a city or town, unless such city or town has


a population in excess of two hundred (200) according to the latest


Federal Decennial Census;


5. Sell any alcoholic beverage on credit; provided, that


acceptance by a licensee of a cash or debit card or a nationally


recognized credit card in lieu of actual cash payment does not



Req. No. 622 Page 2


constitute the extension of credit; provided, further, as used in


this section:


a. “cash or debit card” means any instrument or device


whether known as a debit card or by any other name,


issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of


the cardholder in depositing, obtaining or


transferring funds from a consumer banking electronic


facility, and


b. “nationally recognized credit card” means any


instrument or device, whether known as a credit card,


credit plate, charge plate or by any other name,


issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of


the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services or


anything else of value on credit which is accepted by


over one hundred retail locations;


6. Offer or furnish any prize, premium, gift or similar


inducement to a consumer in connection with the sale of alcoholic


beverages, except that:


a. goods or merchandise included by the manufacturer in


packaging with alcoholic beverages or for packaging


with alcoholic beverages shall not be included in this


prohibition, but; provided, that no wholesaler or


retailer shall sell any alcoholic beverage prepackaged


with other goods or merchandise at a price which is

Req. No. 622 Page 3


greater than the price at which the alcoholic beverage


alone is sold; provided, it shall not be considered


inducement or a premium for a nor shall a retail


spirits license holder selling wine, spirits, or beer


at a multiunit discount be included in this


prohibition, or


b. that a retail spirits licensee to have an advertised


may advertise a price posted higher online than the


shelf price on the licensed premises; or


7. Pay for alcoholic beverages by a check or draft which is


dishonored by the drawee when presented to such drawee for payment;


and the ABLE Commission may cancel or suspend the license of any


retailer who has given a check or draft, as maker or endorser, which


is so dishonored upon presentation.


B. No retail spirits licensee shall permit any person under


twenty-one (21) years of age to enter into or remain within or about


the licensed premises unless accompanied by the person’s parent or


legal guardian; provided, however, this restriction shall not apply


to an employee of a licensed beer distributor or wine and spirits


wholesaler who:


1. Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;


2. Is accompanied by a coworker at least twenty-one (21) years


of age; and



Req. No. 622 Page 4


3. Enters for the sole purpose of merchandising or delivering


product to the licensee in the normal course of business.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 6-104, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 6-104. No wine or spirits wholesaler licensee shall


sell or deliver, and no wine or spirits retail licensee shall


receive:


1. Any amount of spirits or wines to any licensee on Sunday; or


2. Any amount of spirits or wines to any licensee on New Year’s


Day, the Fourth of July, Thanksgiving Day or Christmas Day; or


3. Any amount of spirits or wines to any licensee at a price


less than fifteen percent (15%) above the wine and spirits


wholesaler’s laid in cost of such spirit or wine; provided, this


provision shall not apply to any spirit or wine which the wine and


spirit wholesaler has discontinued or closed out from its brand


offerings in this state. For purposes of this section, “laid in


cost” shall mean the wine and spirit wholesaler’s cost from the


supplier, less supplier support if any, plus any inbound freight


costs, handling costs, and taxes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-622 CAD 1/16/2025 2:32:37 PM





Req. No. 622 Page 5